hyph_eo_XX.dic
.meme2
mer2i3t
.met2i3l
mez2alianc
.mez2o
.mi3t
.mi4a3
.mi4s3
mi5asm
mi5aŭ
.mi5s4al
.mi5s4ia
.mi5s4ie
.mi5s4ii
mi5s4il
.mi5s4io
.mi5s4iu
mil2i4t1
mil3o2n
mil3o2p
minorit2a3t
mob2i3l
.mod2u3l
.mol2a3r
molek2u3l
mom2ant
mon2a3t
.mon3t
morb2i3d
morf2e3m
.mosk2i3t
.mot2e3t
.mu3l
mu3z
.mul2a3t
mul2t1
mul2t3eg
mul3t2ipl
mul3ta
mul3te.
mul3to
mul4t3obl
mult2e
.musk2a3t
n2kv
n2o3bl
n2s3t2r
n4s3l
najb4a1r
nap4o5leo
naŭt2i3l
.nav2i3g
.ne2nia3
.ne3t
.neb2u3l
.negl2i3ĝ
.nei2
.nel2
.nema2l1
.neof2i3t
.ni4a3
.no4v
.nor2d1
nor2d1a2z
.norv2e3g
.nu3l
.num2i3d
o1
o2fic
o3e
oa2
of2i3l
oi2
ok2u3l
.ok3o2n
.ok3o2p
.okciden2t1
okcip2i3t
okr2a3t
oks2i3d
.okt2an3t
ol2i3t
oli2v
.om2a3r
.om2e3g
.oml2e3t
on2d1r
.opid2u3m
opos2u3m
or1k2e3str
.or2t
.or5t2ho
ordin2a3t
.orien2t1
orien2t1a2z
.ort2o3rel
p1n2
p2a3per
p2e3c
p2et
p2i3t4eci
.pa2s
.pa2ŝ
pa3ser
.paĉ2u3l
.pal2a3t
.pal2e3str
palp2i3t
pamfl2e3t
.paraz2i3t
parf2u3m
parg2e3t
paro2l3
partik2u3l
partik2u3l2a3r
paskv2i3l
.ped2an3t
.pedik2u3l2ar
perf2i3d
pers2i3s3t
persv2a3d
pfen2i3g
.pi3g
pi3r2a3t
.pi3r2i3t
pi3ram2id
.pi3s3t
pie2d1i2ng
.pin2t
.pin3d
pl2aĉ
.pl2e2j1
.pl2e3t
pl2i3l2a3rĝ
.pl4
pl4at
.ple2n3
plebisc2i3t
pleja2
plu2m1in2g
.plu2r1
.plu3m
.po2e3m
.po2e3t
po2marb
.po2r
.po2s2t1
.po2ŝ
.po2ŝ2t1
.pol2a3r
.pom2a3d
.pon3t
pop2u3l2a3r
portr2e3t
pos3t2ament
pos3t2e2n
pos3t2iljon
pos3t2u3l
post2esign
poŝ3t2ele
poŝ3t2ranĉ
poŝ3t2uk
pr2e3m
pr2et
.pr2is3m
.pr4
pre2st2i3ĝ
precip2i3t
.prel2a3t
prep2a3r
prestid2i3g2i3t
.prete2r1
preter2i3t
prim2a3r
.prim2a3t
priorit2a3t
.priv2a3t
prob1l2e4m3
.prod2i3g
prof2e3t
prof2i3t
.prol2e3t
prozel2i3t
ps2i3l
pterodakt2i3l
.pu2ŝ
.pu3l
.pu3m
.pup2i3l
.pust2u3l
r2d1r
r2e3g
r2et1aj.
r2et1ajn.
r2et1oj.
r2et1ojn.
r2et1on.
r2et3an.
r2eta.
r2ete.
r2eto.
r2id
r2k1l
r2s3f
r2s3m
r3l2i3g
.rab2a3t
rad2a3r
.rak2e3t
.rak2on3t
rap2i3d
.re2f3l2ig
.re2ĝ
.re2sp.
.re2spond
.re2spublik
.re2tro
re3ĝim
re3ĝust
referend2u3m
reg2u2l1
rehabil2i3t
.rem2e3t
.rem2on3t
remp2a3r
.ren2a3
.renk2on3t
.res2u3m
retik2u3l
rez2i3d
.rez2i3s3t
rezult2a3t
rig2i3d
ril2a3t
rip2a3r
.ris3m
.rodr2i3g
rozal4in3d
rs3l
.ru3l
.ruk2u3l
s1c
s1f
s1k
s1p
s1t
s1v
s2ci
s2krib
s2p2e3c
s2t2a3r
.sa2m
sa2m1ur2b
sa3m2ar
.sa3m2u3m
sa3m2uraj
.sab2a3t
.sal2a3t
sanit2a3r
sanskr2i3t
satel2i3t
scint2i3l
se2kvinber
.se2n1
.se2p3o2n
.se2p3o2p
.se2s3o2n
.se2s3o2p
sek2s1eksc
sek2u3l2a3r
sekr2e3t
sekund2a3r
sekva3
.sen2a3t
sen2e2skal
sen2il
.sen2t2em
.sen3s4t
.sene2l1i2r
sent3emo
.ser2u3m
seren2a3d
.si2n
si3n2us
si3rin
.si4a3
sibar2i3t
.sim2u3l
sin1a2kuz
sin1o2fer
sindik2a3t
sing2u3l2ar
sinjo2r3
.sis3m
.sk2e3m
.sk2i3s3m
.sk2i3s3t
.sk2i3t
.sk4
skal2a3r
skarl2a3t
skel2e3t
skra2p1
skrup2u3l
skva2m1
.sof2is3
sol2i3d
sol2i3d2a3r
sold2a3t
somnamb2u3l
.son2a3t
.son2e3t
.sov2e3t
sove4t1u2ni
.sp2i3t
.sp4
spag2e3t
speg2u3l
.spek2u3l
spi3r2i3t
spin2e3t
.spl2i3t
.spl4
spr2i3t
.spr4
st2a3t
.st2i3l
.st4
st4a3c2i3
stab2i3l
staf2e3t
stalagm2i3t
stalakt2i3t
stenc2i3l
.stern2u3m
stigm2a3t
.stil2e3t
.stil2i3t
.stim2u3l
.str2i3d
.str2i3g
.str4
.stra3t2e3g
strob2i3l
strof2a4n3t2
.su2b1
.su2ĉ3i2nf
.su2d1a2f
.su2d1a2m
.su2d1a2zi
.su2d1aŭ
.su2d1eŭr
.su2d1r
.su3b2i3t
.su3b2ute
.su3m
subt2i3l
.supe2r1
surog2a3t
.sv4
svah2i3l
ŝ1m
ŝ1n
ŝ1p
ŝ1t
ŝ1v
ŝ2nur
ŝ2p2ar
ŝ2pin
ŝ2t2a3t
ŝ2veb
ŝ2vel
ŝi2p1
.ŝi4a3
ŝibol2e3t
.ŝm2
ŝp2at
.ŝte2l1
ŝv2i3t
t2e3m
t2zg
t2zs
t5c2h
ta2g1l2
.tab2u3l
tal2a3r
tal2an3t
tamar4in3d
.tand2e3m
tarant2u3l
tat2a3r
te4or2em
telev2i3d
tereb2in3t
.term2i3t
.ti3g
.ti3ran
.ti4a3
.ti4e
.ti4o
.ti4u3
tia4l
.tia4m1
.tib2e3t
.tie4s
tim2i3d
.tio4m1
.tok2a3t
tolst2oj.
tom2a3t
tr2e3m
tr2et
.tr4
.tran2s3
tran3s4ept
tran3s4i2stor
tran3s4it
tran3s4pir
tran4s5i4tal
trankv2i3l3
.trans2i3t
.trio2p
.tris2
troglod2i3t
.tru3l
.tru3m
.tu2t1
tual2e2t
tuberk2u3l
turb2u3l
u1
u2e3nask
u2t2i3l
u2z
.ul2u3l
ultim2a3t
universit2a3t
.unu2a
unu3a2nim
uo2
.uv2u3l
ŭa2
ŭe2
ŭi2
ŭo2
ŭu2
uzulinterfaco
v2a3r
v2i3d
val2i3d
.van2i3l
var2m3
.ve2st2i3ĝ
veg2e3t
.vel2a3r
.vend2e3t
.vert2i3ĝ
.vi2c1
.vi2r1
.vi2ŝ
.vi2v1
.vi3c2ia
.vi3c2io
.vi3g2i3l
vi3r2ulent
.vi3t
.vi4a3
.vi4st2ul
vi5a4nd
vi5atik
.vin3d
vinj2et
vir2g
vir2us
vir3genr
viz2i3t
viza2ĝ1
.vo2j1
.vo3j2aĝ
vodev2i3l
vol2on3t
vol2u3m
volat2i3l
vor2t1
vor2t1uz
vort2od
vort2op
vulg2a3r
vulg2a3t
.warin5g2hi2en
zen2i3t
zo2o
zor2g
